Utah statutes.
41-6a-716.   Driving on tollway without paying toll prohibited.

(1)  As used in this section, "tollway" has the same meaning as defined in Section 72-6-118.

(2)  The operator of a vehicle traveling on a tollway shall pay the toll imposed by the department or other entity for that tollway under Section 72-6-118.

(3)  A person who violates Subsection (2) is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

